California statutes. Vehicle Code
(c) A person who, with fraudulent intent, displays or causes or permits to be displayed a forged, counterfeit, or false disabled person placard, is subject to the issuance of a notice of parking violation imposing a civil penalty of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) and
 not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), for which enforcement shall be governed by the procedures set forth in Article 3 (commencing with Section 40200) of Chapter 1 of Division 17, or is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for six months, a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both that fine and imprisonment, which penalty shall not be suspended.

(d) For purposes of subdivision (b) or (c), “disabled person placard” means a placard issued pursuant to Section 22511.55 or 22511.59.

(e) A person who, with intent to prejudice, damage, or defraud, commits any of the following acts is guilty of an infraction, and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine of not less
 than one hundred dollars ($100) and not more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for a first offense, not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) and not more than five hundred dollars ($500) for a second offense, and not less than five hundred dollars ($500) and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for a third or subsequent offense, which penalty shall not be suspended:

(1) Forges, counterfeits, or falsifies a Clean Air Sticker or a comparable clean air sticker relating to high-occupancy vehicle lane privileges provided for by a foreign jurisdiction, or forges, counterfeits, or falsifies a Clean Air Sticker with intent to represent it as issued by the department.

(2) Passes, or attempts to pass, as true and genuine, a false, forged, or counterfeit Clean Air Sticker
 knowing it to be false, forged, or counterfeited.

(3) Acquires, possesses, sells, or offers for sale a counterfeit Clean Air Sticker.

(4) Acquires, possesses, sells, or offers for sale a genuine Clean Air Sticker separate from the vehicle for which the department issued that sticker.

(f) As used in this section, “Clean Air Sticker” means a label or decal issued pursuant to Sections 5205.5 and 21655.9.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 746, Sec. 1.   (AB 984)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

4463.3.

In addition to, or instead of, any fine imposed for conviction of a violation of subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 4463, the court may impose a civil penalty of not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each conviction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 215, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

4463.5.

(a) No person shall manufacture or sell a decorative or facsimile license plate of a size substantially similar to the license plate issued by the department.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the director may authorize the manufacture and sale of decorative or facsimile license plates for special events or media productions.

(c) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500).

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 859, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

4464.

A person shall not display upon a vehicle a license plate that is altered from its original markings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 702, Sec. 2.   (AB 2489)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4465.

(a) A legal owner of record of a vehicle may request, and the department shall furnish, information regarding the current registration status of the vehicle, including the license plate number and address of the registered owner of the vehicle. The department may charge a fee to pay for the cost of furnishing this information.

(b) (1) By January 1, 2010, the department shall be in full compliance with the federal Anti Car Theft Act of 1992 (P.L. 102-519) and the United States Department of Justice (DOJ) rules governing the federal National Motor Vehicle Title Information System (NMVTIS) (49 U.S.C. Sec. 30501 et seq.), to the extent practicable.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), by January 1, 2010, the department shall eliminate any restrictions to consumer access to titling, branding, and theft information provided by the department to NMVTIS, to ensure that prospective purchasers have instant and reliable access to California’s data.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 226.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4466.

(a) The department shall not issue a duplicate or substitute certificate of title or license plate if, after a search of the records of the department, the registered owner’s address, as submitted on the application, is different from that which appears in the records of the department, unless the registered owner applies in person and presents all of the following:

(1) Proof of ownership of the vehicle that is acceptable to the department. Proof of ownership may be the certificate of title, registration certificate, or registration renewal notice, or a facsimile or photocopy of any of those documents, if the facsimile or photocopy matches the vehicle record of the department.

(2) A driver’s license or identification card containing a picture of the licensee or cardholder issued to the registered owner by the department pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 12500) of Division 6. The department shall conduct a search of its records to verify the authenticity of any document submitted under this paragraph.

(A) If the registered owner is a resident of another state or country, the registered owner shall present a driver’s license or identification card issued by that state or country. In addition, the registered owner shall provide photo documentation in the form of a valid passport, military identification card, identification card issued by a state or United States government agency, student identification card issued by a college or university, or identification card issued by a California-based employer. If a resident of another state is unable to
 present the required photo identification, the department shall verify the authenticity of the driver’s license or identification card by contacting the state that issued the driver’s license or identification card.

(B) If the registered owner is not an individual, the person submitting the application shall submit the photo identification required pursuant to this paragraph, as well as documentation acceptable to the department that demonstrates that the person is employed by an officer of the registered owner.

(3) If the application is for the purpose of replacing a license plate that was stolen, a copy of a police report identifying the plate as stolen.

(4) If the application is for the purpose of replacing a certificate of title or license plate that was mutilated or destroyed, the remnants of the mutilated or
 destroyed document or plate.

(5) If the department has a record of a prior issuance of a duplicate or substitute certificate of title or license plate for the vehicle within the past 90 days, a copy of a report from the Department of the California Highway Patrol verifying the vehicle identification number of the vehicle.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply if any of the following applies:

(1) The registered owner’s name, address, and driver’s license or identification card number submitted on the application match the name, address, and driver’s license or identification card number contained in the department’s records.

(2) An application for a duplicate or substitute certificate of title or license plate is submitted by or through one of the
 following:

(A) A legal owner, if the legal owner is not the same person as the registered owner or as the lessee under Section 4453.5.

(B) A dealer or an agent of the dealer.

(C) A dismantler.

(D) An insurer or an agent of the insurer.

(E) A salvage pool.

(c) At the discretion of the department, subdivision (a) does not apply in any of the following circumstances:

(1) An application for a duplicate or substitute certificate of title or license plate is submitted by a licensed registration service representing any of the following:

(A) A person or entity listed in subparagraphs (A) to (E), inclusive, of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b).

(B) A business entity recognized under the laws of this state or the laws of any foreign or domestic jurisdiction whose laws are in parity with the laws of this state.

(C) A court-appointed bankruptcy referee.

(D) A person who is an individual, is not included in subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, and submits to the licensed registration service an application with a signature that is validated by a notary public. The licensed registration service shall maintain full and complete records of its transactions conducted pursuant to this subparagraph and shall make those records available for inspection by an investigator of the Department of Motor
 Vehicles, investigator of the Department of the California Highway Patrol, a city police department, a county sheriff’s office, or a district attorney’s office, if the investigator requests access to the record and the request is for the purpose of a criminal investigation.

(2) The vehicle is registered under the International Registration Plan pursuant to Section 8052 or under the Permanent Fleet Registration program pursuant to Article 9.5 (commencing with Section 5301).

(3) The vehicle is an implement of husbandry, as defined in Section 36000, or a tow dolly, or has been issued an identification plate under Section 5014 or 5014.1.

(d) The department shall issue one or more license plates only to the registered owner or lessee. The department shall issue the certificate of title only to the legal owner, or if none,
 then to the registered owner, as shown on the department’s records.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 227.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4467.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the department shall issue new and different license plates immediately upon request to the registered owner of a vehicle who appears in person and submits a completed application, if all of the following are provided:

(1) Proof of ownership of the vehicle that is acceptable to the department.

(2) A driver’s license or identification card containing a picture of the licensee or cardholder issued to the registered owner by the department pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 12500) of Division 6. The department shall conduct a search of its records to verify the authenticity of any document submitted under this
 paragraph.

(3) The previously issued license plates from the vehicle.

(4) The payment of required fees under subdivision (c) of Section 4850 and subdivision (b) of Section 9265 for the issuance of duplicate license plates.

(5) One of the following:

(A) A copy of a police report, court documentation, or other law enforcement documentation identifying the registered owner of the vehicle as the victim of an incident of domestic violence, as specified in Section 1708.6 of the Civil Code, the subject of stalking, as specified in Section 1708.7 of the Civil Code or Section 646.9 of the Penal Code, the victim of a rape, as defined in Section 261 or former Section 262 of the Penal Code, or the victim of a sexual battery, as defined in Section 1708.5 of the
 Civil Code.

(B) A written acknowledgment, dated within 30 days of submission, on the letterhead of a domestic violence agency or a rape crisis center, that the registered owner is actively seeking assistance or has sought assistance from that agency within the past year.

(C) An active protective order as defined in Section 6218 of the Family Code, or issued pursuant to Section 527.6 or 527.8 of the Code of Civil Procedure, that names the registered owner as a protected party.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to special license plates issued under Article 8 (commencing with Section 5000) of Chapter 1 of Division 3, special interest license plates issued under Article 8.4 (commencing with Section 5060) of Chapter 1 of Division 3, or environmental license plates issued under Article 8.5 (commencing with Section 5100)
 of Chapter 1 of Division 3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 626, Sec. 73.   (AB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Renewal of Registration [4600. - 4610.]

4600.

Certificates of ownership shall not be renewed annually but shall remain valid until suspended, revoked, or canceled by the department for cause or upon a transfer of any interest shown therein.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

4601.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this code, every vehicle registration and registration card expires at midnight on the expiration date designated by the director pursuant to Section 1651.5, and shall be renewed prior to the expiration of the registration year. The department may, upon payment of the proper fees, renew the registration of vehicles.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, renewal of registration for any vehicle that is either currently registered or for which a certification pursuant to Section 4604 has been filed may be obtained not more than 75 days prior to the expiration of the current registration or certification.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) or any other law, commencing upon the effective date of the act that added this subdivision, the renewal of registration for a vehicle that expires on or before June 30, 2011, may be obtained not more than 75 days prior to the expiration of the current registration or certification and the renewal of registration for a vehicle that expires on or after July 1, 2011, or for which a certification, pursuant to Section 4604, has been filed, may not be obtained until the expiration of the current registration or certification or until the department has issued a notice of renewal, whichever occurs first. This subdivision shall become inoperative on January 1, 2012.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 21, Sec. 4.   (SB 94)   Effective May 4, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4601.5.

Notwithstanding Section 4601, the registration for vehicles registered pursuant to the Partial Year Registration Program as described in Article 5 (commencing with Section 9700) of Chapter 6 of Division 3, expires at midnight of December 31 of the registration year. However, for the purposes of applying any future reductions or increases in the vehicle license fee, the vehicle registrations subject to this section shall be deemed to have a final expiration date in the succeeding calendar year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 169, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

4602.

Application for renewal of a vehicle registration shall be made by the owner not later than midnight of the expiration date, and shall be made by presentation of the registration card last issued for the vehicle or by presentation of a potential registration card issued by the department for use at the time of renewal and by payment of the full registration year fee for the vehicle as provided in this code. If the registration card and potential registration card are unavailable, a fee as specified in Section 9265 shall not be paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1268, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

4603.

Whenever in his opinion the interests of the State will be promoted thereby, the director with the approval of the Governor may extend for a period not to exceed 10 days the closing of the period during which applications for renewal of registration may be presented without the payment of penalties.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

4604.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (d), prior to the expiration of the registration of a vehicle, if that registration is not to be renewed prior to its expiration, the owner of the vehicle shall file, under penalty of perjury, a certification that the vehicle will not be operated, moved, or left standing upon a highway without first making an application for registration of the vehicle, including full payment of all fees. The certification is valid until the vehicle’s registration is renewed pursuant to subdivision (c).

(b) Each certification filed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be accompanied by a filing fee of fifteen dollars ($15).

(c) (1) An application for renewal of registration, except when accompanied by an application for transfer of title to, or an interest in, the vehicle, shall be submitted to the department with payment of the required fees for the current registration year and without penalty for delinquent payment of fees imposed under this code or under Part 5 (commencing with Section 10701) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code if the department receives the application prior to or on the date the vehicle is first operated, moved, or left standing upon a highway during the current registration year and the certification required pursuant to subdivision (a) was timely filed with the department.

(2) If an application for renewal of registration is accompanied by an application for transfer of title, that application may be made without incurring a penalty for delinquent payment of fees not later than 20 days after the date the vehicle is first operated, moved, or left standing on a highway if a certification pursuant to subdivision (a) was timely filed with the department.

(d) A certification is not required to be filed pursuant to subdivision (a) for one or more of the following:

(1) A vehicle on which the registration expires while being held as inventory by a dealer or lessor-retailer or while being held pending a lien sale by the keeper of a garage or operator of a towing service.

(2) A vehicle registered pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 8050) of Chapter 4 of Division 3.

(3) A vehicle described in Section 5004, 5004.5, or 5051, as provided in Section 4604.2. However, the registered owner may file a certificate of nonoperation in lieu of the certification specified in subdivision (a).

(4) A vehicle registered pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 9700) of Chapter 6 if the registered owner has complied with subdivision (c) of Section 9706.

(e) Notwithstanding Section 670, for purposes of this section, a “vehicle” is a device by which a person or property may be propelled, moved, or driven upon a highway having intact and assembled its major component parts including, but not limited to, the frame or chassis, cowl, and floor pan or, in the case of a trailer, the frame and wheels or, in the case of a motorcycle, the frame, front fork, and engine. For purposes of this section, “vehicle” does not include a device moved exclusively by human power, a device used exclusively upon stationary rails or tracks, or a motorized wheelchair.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 574, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

4604.2.

(a) When the registration of a vehicle registered on a partial year basis has expired and the vehicle is not thereafter operated, moved, or left standing upon a highway, and the vehicle is in compliance with subdivision (b) of Section 9706 applying to vehicles registered on a partial year basis, an application for renewal made subsequent to that expiration shall be accompanied by a certificate of nonoperation.

(b) An application for registration or renewal of registration of a vehicle described in Section 5004 or 5004.5 that has not been operated, moved, or left standing upon a highway shall be accompanied by a certificate of nonoperation for the period during which the vehicle was not registered.

(c) A certificate of nonoperation may be accepted for a vehicle registered pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 8050) of Chapter 4 solely for the purpose of waiver of penalties.

(d) The application for registration or renewal of registration of vehicles specified in subdivisions (a) and (b), whether or not accompanied by an application for transfer of title, shall be accepted by the department upon payment of the proper fees for the current registration year without the payment of delinquent fees imposed under this code or Part 5 (commencing with Section 10701) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code if the department receives the application and certificate of nonoperation prior to the date the vehicle is first operated, moved, or left standing upon a highway during the current registration year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 574, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

4604.5.

(a) (1) If the vehicle has not been operated, moved, or left standing upon any highway subsequent to the expiration of the vehicle’s registration, the certification specified in Section 4604 or 4604.2 may be filed after the expiration of the registration of a vehicle, but not later than 90 days after the expiration date, subject to the payment of the filing fee specified in Section 4604 and the penalty specified in paragraph (2).

(2) A penalty shall be collected on any certification specified in Section 4604 or 4604.2 filed later than midnight of the date of expiration of registration. The penalty shall be computed as provided in Sections 9406 and 9559 and after the registration and weight fees have been combined with the license fee specified in Section 10751 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, as follows:

(A) For a delinquency period of 10 days or less, the penalty is 10 percent of the fee.

(B) For a delinquency period of more than 10 days, to and including 30 days, the penalty is 20 percent of the fee.

(C) For a delinquency period of more than 30 days, to and including 90 days, the penalty is 60 percent of the fee.

(3) This subdivision applies to the renewal of registration for vehicles with expiration dates on or before December 31, 2002.

(b) The certification specified in Sections 4604 and 4604.2 may be filed no more than 90 days after the expiration of the registration of a vehicle if the vehicle has not been operated, moved, or left standing upon any highway subsequent to the expiration of the vehicle’s registration. A penalty shall be collected on any certification specified in Section 4604 or 4604.2 filed later than midnight of the date of expiration of registration. After 90 days, the vehicle must be registered pursuant to Section 4601. A certification filed pursuant to this subdivision is subject to the payment of the filing fee specified in Section 4604 and the payment of the penalties specified in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of this subdivision.

(1) The penalty for late payment of the registration fee provided in Section 9250 is as follows:

(A) For a delinquency period of 10 days or less, the penalty is ten dollars ($10).

(B) For a delinquency period of more than 10 days, to and including 30 days, the penalty is fifteen dollars ($15).

(C) For a delinquency period of more than 30 days, to and including 90 days, the penalty is thirty dollars ($30).

(2) The penalty on the weight fee and the vehicle license fee shall be computed after the weight fee as provided in Section 9400 or 9400.1 plus the vehicle license fee specified in Section 10751 of the Revenue and Taxation Code have been added together as follows:

(A) For a delinquency period of 10 days or less, the penalty is 10 percent of the fee.

(B) For a delinquency period exceeding 10 days, to and including 30 days, the penalty is 20 percent of the fee.

(C) For a delinquency period of more than 30 days, to and including 90 days, the penalty is 60 percent of the fee.

(3) Weight fees not reported and not paid within 20 days, as required by Section 9406, shall be assessed a penalty on the difference in the weight fee, as follows:

(A) For a delinquency period of 10 days or less, the penalty is 10 percent of the fee.

(B) For a delinquency period exceeding 10 days, to and including 30 days, the penalty is 20 percent of the fee.

(C) For a delinquency period of more than 30 days, to and including 90 days, the penalty is 60 percent of the fee.

(c) This section shall apply to registration renewals that expire on or after January 1, 2003.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 805, Sec. 12.   Effective September 23, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

4605.

Notwithstanding Section 4000 of this code, and notwithstanding Section 38020 of this code, no fees or penalties imposed under this code or under Part 5 (commencing with Section 10701) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code shall accrue due to operation of a vehicle in conjunction with the theft or embezzlement of the vehicle if the owner or legal owner submits a certificate in writing setting forth the circumstances of the theft or embezzlement and certifies that the theft or embezzlement of the vehicle has been reported pursuant to the provisions of this code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 935.)
-------------------------------------------

4606.

Notwithstanding any provision of subdivision (a) of Section 5204 to the contrary, when an application for the registration of a vehicle has been made as required in Sections 4152.5 and 4602, the vehicle may be operated on the highways until the new indicia of current registration have been received from the department, upon condition that there be displayed on the vehicle the license plates and validating devices, if any, issued to the vehicle for the previous registration year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 258, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

4607.

The department, upon renewing a registration, shall issue a new registration card to the owner as upon an original registration.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

4609.

The department may extend the life of the current series of license plates, outstanding during 1957, and may hereafter issue a new series of license plates for an indefinite period of time, but in no event for a period less than five (5) years. During each intervening year of the period for which the plates are issued, the department shall issue a tab, sticker, or other suitable device as herein provided.

Any such series of plates may be canceled by the director with the approval of the Governor at any time after five years from the year of issuance of such series.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

4610.

The department may authorize an endorsement of a receipt or the validation of a registration card or potential registration card as provided in this code by a person or organization holding a certificate of authority issued under the provisions of Part 5 (commencing with Section 12140) of Division 2 of the Insurance Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 454, Sec. 181.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Refusal of Registration [4750. - 4767.]

4750.

The department shall refuse registration, or renewal or transfer of registration, upon any of the following grounds:

(a) The application contains any false or fraudulent statement.

(b) The required fee has not been paid.

(c) The registration, or renewal or transfer of registration, is prohibited by the requirements of Part 5 (commencing with Section 43000) of Division 26 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) The owner of a heavy vehicle, which is subject to the heavy vehicle use tax imposed pursuant to Section 4481 of Title 26 of the United States Code, has not presented sufficient evidence, as determined by the department, that the tax for the vehicle has been paid pursuant to that section.

(e) Evidence of financial responsibility, that is required for a vehicle registration renewal where there is no change in registered owner, has not been provided to the department pursuant to Section 4000.37 or electronically. This subdivision does not apply to any of the following:

(1) A vehicle for which a certification has been filed pursuant to Section 4604, until the vehicle is registered for operation upon the highway.

(2) A vehicle owned or leased by, or under the direction of, the United States or any public entity that is included in Section 811.2 of the Government Code.

(3) A vehicle registration renewal application where there is a change of registered owner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 880, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

4750.1.

(a) If the department receives an application for registration of a specially constructed passenger vehicle or pickup truck after it has registered 500 specially constructed vehicles during that calendar year pursuant to Section 44017.4 of the Health and Safety Code, and the vehicle has not been previously registered, the vehicle shall be assigned the same model-year as the calendar year in which the application is submitted, for purposes of determining emissions inspection requirements for the vehicle.

(b) (1) If the department receives an application for registration of a specially constructed passenger vehicle or pickup truck that has been previously registered after it has registered 500 specially
 constructed vehicles during that calendar year pursuant to Section 44017.4 of the Health and Safety Code, and the application requests a model-year determination different from the model-year assigned in the previous registration, the application for registration shall be denied and the vehicle owner is subject to the emission control and inspection requirements applicable to the model-year assigned in the previous registration.

(2) For a vehicle participating in the amnesty program in effect from July 1, 2011, to June 30, 2012, pursuant to Section 9565, the model-year of the previous registration shall be the calendar year of the year in which the vehicle owner applied for amnesty. However, a denial of an application for registration issued pursuant to this paragraph does not preclude the vehicle owner from applying for a different model-year determination and application for registration under Section 44017.4 of the Health and Safety Code in
 a subsequent calendar year.

(c) (1) The Bureau of Automotive Repair may charge the vehicle owner who applies to participate in the amnesty program a fee for each referee station inspection conducted pursuant to Section 9565. The fee shall be one hundred sixty dollars ($160) and shall be collected by the referee station performing the inspection.

(2) A contract to perform referee services may authorize direct compensation to the referee contractor from the inspection fees collected pursuant to paragraph (1). The referee contractor shall deposit the inspection fees collected from the vehicle owner into a separate trust account that the referee contractor shall account for and manage in accordance with generally accepted accounting standards and principles. Where the department conducts the inspections pursuant to Section 9565, the inspection fees collected by
 the department shall be deposited into the Vehicle Inspection and Repair Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 388, Sec. 1.   (AB 2461)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4750.4.

Information provided by an insurer to the department pursuant to Section 11580.10 of the Insurance Code and former Section 4750.2, as added by Chapter 946 of the Statutes of 1991, shall be made available only to law enforcement agencies for law enforcement purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 193, Sec. 194.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

4750.5.

(a) The department shall withhold the registration or the transfer of registration of any vehicle sold at retail to any applicant by any person other than a vehicle manufacturer or dealer holding a license and certificate issued pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11700) of Division 5, or an automobile dismantler holding a license and certificate issued pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 11500) of Division 5, or a lessor-retailer holding a license issued pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11600) of Division 5, and subject to the provisions of Section 11615.5, until the applicant pays to the department the use tax measured by the sales price of the vehicle as required by the Sales and Use Tax Law (Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code), together with penalty, if any, unless the State Board of Equalization finds that no use tax is due. If the applicant so desires, he may pay the use tax and penalty, if any, to the department so as to secure immediate action upon his application for registration or transfer of registration, and thereafter he may apply through the Department of Motor Vehicles to the State Board of Equalization under the provisions of the Sales and Use Tax Law for a refund of the amount so paid.

(b) The department shall transmit to the State Board of Equalization all collections of use tax and penalty made under this section. This transmittal shall be made at least monthly, accompanied by a schedule in such form as the department and board may prescribe.

(c) The State Board of Equalization shall reimburse the department for its costs incurred in carrying out the provisions of this section. Such reimbursement shall be effected under agreement between the agencies, approved by the Department of Finance.

(d) In computing any use tax or penalty thereon under the provisions of this section, dollar fractions shall be disregarded in the manner specified in Section 9559 of this code. Payment of tax and penalty on this basis shall be deemed full compliance with the requirements of the Sales and Use Tax Law insofar as they are applicable to the use of vehicles to which this section relates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1284.)
-------------------------------------------

4750.6.

(a) The department shall transmit to the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration all collections of tax and penalty made under paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 4456 of this code and Section 6295 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. This transmittal shall be made within 30 days, accompanied by a schedule in such form as the department and California Department of Tax and Fee Administration may prescribe.

(b) The California Department of Tax and Fee Administration shall reimburse the department for its costs incurred in carrying out paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 4456 of this code and Section 6295 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. The reimbursement shall be effected under agreement between the agencies, approved by the Department of
 Finance.

(c) In computing any tax or penalty thereon under paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 4456 of this code and Section 6295 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, dollar fractions shall be disregarded in the manner specified in Section 9559 of this code. Payment of tax and penalty on this basis shall be deemed full compliance with the requirements of the Sales and Use Tax Law insofar as they are applicable to the use of vehicles to which paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 4456 of this code and Section 6295 of the Revenue and Taxation Code relates.

(d) The amendments to this section made by the act adding this subdivision do not constitute a change in, but are declaratory of, existing law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 256, Sec. 27.   (AB 176)   Effective September 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4751.

The department may refuse registration or the renewal or transfer of registration of a vehicle in any of the following events:

(a) If the department is not satisfied that the applicant is entitled thereto under this code.

(b) If the applicant has failed to furnish the department with information required in the application or reasonable additional information required by the department.

(c) If the department determines that the applicant has made or permitted unlawful use of any registration certificate, certificate of ownership, or license plates.

(d) If the vehicle is mechanically unfit or unsafe to be operated or moved on the highways.

(e) If the department determines that a manufacturer or dealer has failed during the current or previous year to comply with the provisions of this code relating to the giving of notice to the department of the transfer of a vehicle during the current or previous year.

(f) If the department determines that a lien exists, pursuant to Section 9800, against one or more other vehicles in which the applicant has an ownership interest.

(g) If the applicant has failed to furnish the department with an odometer disclosure statement pursuant to subsection (a) of Section 32705 of Title 49 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1035, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

4755.

The department shall refuse registration, or renewal or transfer of registration for any commercial motor vehicle subject to Section 4000.6, if the owner or operator of the motor vehicle at the time of the application has been cited for a violation, pertaining to that vehicle, of Division 26 (commencing with Section 39000) of the Health and Safety Code or regulations of the State Air Resources Board adopted pursuant to that division, until the violation has been cleared, as determined by the State Air Resources Board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 592, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

4760.

(a) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (b) or (d), the department shall refuse to renew the registration of a vehicle if the registered owner or lessee has been mailed a notice of delinquent parking violation relating to standing or parking, the processing agency has filed or electronically transmitted to the department an itemization of unpaid parking penalties, including administrative fees pursuant to Section 40220, and the owner or lessee has not paid the parking penalty and administrative fee pursuant to Section 40211, unless he or she pays to the department, at the time of application for renewal, the full amount of all outstanding parking penalties and administrative fees, as shown
 by records of the
 department, or the itemization of unpaid parking penalties has been rescinded pursuant to Section 40220.

(2) When the department receives the full amount of all outstanding parking penalties and administrative fees pursuant to paragraph (1), it shall issue a receipt showing each parking penalty and administrative fee that has been paid, the processing agency for that penalty and fee, and a description of the vehicle involved in the parking violations. The receipt shall also state that, to reduce the possibility of impoundment under Section 22651 or immobilization under Section 22651.7 of the vehicle involved in the parking violation, the registered owner or lessee may transmit to that processing agency a copy or other evidence of the receipt.

(b) The department shall